Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,251.06
Pushcart, defined.

Pushcart shall mean a non-self-propelled vehicle limited to serving food which is not potentially hazardous or commissary wrapped food maintained at temperatures in compliance with the Nebraska Pure Food Act or limited to the preparation and serving of frankfurters.

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 6.